Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-711 Interest in
"heirs" and like. If an applicable statute or a governing
instrument calls for a present or future distribution to or creates a present
or future interest in a designated individual's "heirs", "heirs
at law", "next of kin", "relatives", or
"family", or language of similar import, the property passes to those
persons, including the State, and in such shares as would succeed to the
designated individual's intestate estate under the intestate succession law of
the designated individual's domicile if the designated individual died when the
disposition is to take effect in possession or enjoyment. If the designated
individual's surviving spouse or reciprocal beneficiary is living but is
remarried or has terminated the reciprocal beneficiary relationship at the time
the disposition is to take effect in possession or enjoyment, the surviving
spouse or reciprocal beneficiary is not an heir of the designated individual.
[L 1996, c 288, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 383, §16]

Cross References

Effect and transition of L 1996, c 288 amendments, see
§560:8-201.

Rules of Court

Determination of heirs, see HPR rule 73.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next